North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3B. State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-48.43.
Effective dates of coverage.

Eligible Employees and Retired Employees. — Employees and retirees who otherwise satisfy the eligibility requirements set forth in

G.S. 135-48.40

will be offered coverage with the following effective dates:

Employees and retired employees covered under the Predecessor Plan will continue to be covered, subject to the terms hereof.

New employees may apply for coverage to be effective on the first day of the month following employment, or on a like date the following month if the employee has enrolled, except that the effective date of coverage for employees who become eligible in
accordance with

G.S. 135-48.40

(e) will be determined by the employing unit in a manner that is consistent with section 4980H of the Internal Revenue Code and the applicable regulations, as amended.

Employees not enrolling or adding dependents when first eligible in accordance with

G.S. 135-48.42

may enroll later during annual enrollment, except employees who elect to change their coverage in accordance with rules adopted by the State Treasurer for optional alternative plans offered under the Plan.

Members of the General Assembly, beginning with the 1985 Session, shall become first eligible with the convening of each Session of the General Assembly, regardless of a Member’s service during previous Sessions. Members and their dependents enrolled
when first eligible after the convening of each Session of the General Assembly will not be subject to any waiting periods for preexisting health conditions. Members of the 1983 Session of the General Assembly, not already
enrolled, shall be eligible to enroll themselves and their dependents on or before October 1, 1983, without being subject to any waiting periods for preexisting health conditions.

Waiting Periods and Preexisting Conditions. —

New employees and dependents age 19 and older enrolling when first eligible are subject to no waiting period for preexisting conditions under the Plan.

Employees age 19 and older not enrolling or not adding dependents age 19 and older when first eligible may enroll later during annual enrollment, but enrollees age 19 or older may be subject to a twelve-month waiting period for preexisting conditions
except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section. The waiting period under this subdivision is subject to applicable federal law.

Retiring employees and dependents enrolled when first eligible after an employee’s retirement are subject to no waiting period for preexisting conditions under the Plan. Retiring employees not enrolled or not adding dependents age 19 and older when first
eligible after an employee’s retirement may enroll at a later time during annual enrollment, but may be subject to a 12-month waiting period for preexisting conditions except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

Employees and dependents enrolling or reenrolling within 12 months after a termination of enrollment or employment that were not enrolled at the time of this previous termination, regardless of the employing units involved, shall not be considered as
newly-eligible employees or dependents for the purposes of waiting periods and preexisting conditions. Employees and dependents transferring from optional prepaid alternative plans available under the Plan; employees and
dependents immediately returning to service from an employing unit’s approved periods of leave without pay for illness, injury, educational improvement, workers’ compensation, parental duties, or for military reasons; employees
and dependents immediately returning to service from a reduction in an employing unit’s work force; retiring employees and dependents reenrolled in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection; formerly-enrolled
dependents reenrolling as eligible employees; formerly-enrolled employees reenrolling as eligible dependents; and employees and dependents reenrolled without waiting periods and preexisting conditions under specific rules
adopted by the State Treasurer in the best interests of the Plan shall not be considered reenrollments for the purpose of this subdivision. Furthermore, employees accepting permanent, full-time appointments who had previously
worked in a part-time or temporary position and their qualified dependents shall not be covered by waiting periods and preexisting conditions under this division provided enrollment as a permanent, full-time employee is
made when the employee and his dependents are first eligible to enroll.

To administer the 12-month waiting period for preexisting conditions for employees age 19 and older and dependents age 19 and older under this Article, the Plan must give credit against the 12-month period for the time a person was covered under a previous
plan if the previous plan’s coverage was continuous to a date not more than 63 days before the effective date of coverage. As used in this subdivision, a “previous plan” means any policy, certificate, contract, or any other
arrangement provided by any accident and health insurer, any hospital or medical service corporation, any health maintenance organization, any preferred provider organization, any multiple employer welfare arrangement,
any self-insured health benefit arrangement, any governmental health benefit or health care plan or program, or any other health benefit arrangement. Waiting periods for preexisting conditions administered under this Article
are subject to applicable federal law.

Dependents of Employees and Retired Employees. —

Dependents of employees and retired employees who have family coverage under the Predecessor Plan will continue to be covered subject to the terms hereof.

Employees who have dependents may apply for family coverage at the time they enroll as provided in subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section and such dependents will be covered under the Plan beginning the same date as such employees.

Employees and retired employees may change from one category of coverage to a different category of coverage without a waiting period for preexisting conditions, and, as applicable, dependents will be covered under the Plan the first of the month or the
first of the second month following the dependent’s eligibility for coverage, provided written application is submitted to the Health Benefits Representative within 30 days of becoming eligible.

Employees or retired employees who wish to change to employee only coverage shall give written notice to their Health Benefits Representative within 30 days after any change in the status of dependents, (resulting from death, divorce, etc.) that requires
a change in contract category. The effective date will be the first of the month following the dependent’s ineligibility event. If notification was not made within the 30 days following the dependent’s ineligibility event,
the dependent will be retroactively removed the first of the month following the dependent’s ineligibility event, and the coverage category change will be the first of the month following written notification, except in
cases of death, in which case the coverage category change will be made retroactive to the first of the month following the death.

Employees not adding dependents age 19 and older when first eligible may enroll later during annual enrollment, but dependents may be subject to a 12-month waiting period for preexisting health conditions except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this
section.

Employees or retired employees who wish to change to employee only coverage even though their dependents continue to be eligible, shall give written notification to their Health Benefits Representative. Except as otherwise required by applicable federal
law, the date of this category change will be the first of the month following written notification or any first of the month thereafter as desired by the employee.

The effective date for newborns or adopted children will be date of birth, date of adoption, or placement with adoptive parent provided member is currently covered under employee and family or employee and child coverage. If the member wishes to add a
newborn or adopted child and is currently enrolled in employee only coverage, the member must submit application for coverage and a coverage type change within 30 days of the child’s birth or date of adoption or placement.
Effective date for the coverage category change is the first of the month in which the child is born, adopted, or placed. Adopted children may also be covered the first of the month following placement or adoption.

Categories of Coverage Available. — There are four categories of coverage which an employee or retiree may elect.

Employee Only. — Covers enrolled employees only. Maternity benefits are provided to employee only.

Employee and Child. — Covers enrolled employee and all eligible dependent children. Maternity benefits are provided to the employee only.

Employee and Family. — Covers employee and spouse, and all eligible dependent children. Maternity benefits are provided to employee or enrolled spouse.

Employee and Spouse. — Covers employee and spouse only. Maternity benefits are provided to the employee or the employee’s enrolled spouse.

Firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard are subject to the same terms and conditions of this section as are employees. Eligible dependents of firefighters, rescue squad workers, and members of the National Guard are subject
to the same terms and conditions of this section as are dependents of employees.

If any provision of this section is in conflict with applicable federal law, federal law shall control to the extent of the conflict.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 499; c. 761, ss. 252-255; c. 867, s. 4; c. 922, s. 5; 1985, c. 400, ss. 5, 6; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 5(b), 20; 1987, c. 857, s. 13; 1991, c. 427, ss. 10-12;
1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.23(b); 1997-512, ss. 28-31, 40; 1999-237, s. 28.29(g); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(h); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (h); 2009-16, ss. 3(d), 5(a); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-85, ss. 1.7(d), 2.6(e), 2.10; 2011-96, ss.
2(d)(2), 3(d); 2012-173, s. 2(c); 2013-324, s. 4; 2014-100, s. 35.16(a), (d).

Local Modification.

Bladen: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Cherokee: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Mitchell: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007- 405, s. 1; Rutherford: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32;
Washington: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; Wilkes: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s. 29.32; and towns of Biltmore Forest: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007- 405, s. 1; Black Creek: 2004-124,
s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Black Mountain: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Blowing Rock: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Forest City: 2004- 124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2005-276, s.
29.32; Ocean Isle Beach: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Sunset Beach: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1; Tabor City: 2004-124, s. 31.26, as amended by 2007-405, s. 1.

§ 135-48.44.
Cessation of coverage.

Coverage under this Plan of an employee and his or her surviving spouse or eligible dependent children or of a retired employee and his or her surviving spouse or eligible dependent children shall cease on the earliest of the following dates:

The last day of the month in which an employee or retired employee dies. Provided such surviving spouse or eligible dependent children were covered under the Plan at the time of death of the former employee or retired employee, or were covered on September
30, 1986, any such surviving spouse or eligible dependent children may then elect to continue coverage under the Plan by submitting written application to the Claims Processor and by paying the cost for such coverage when
due at the applicable fees. Such coverage shall cease on the last day of the month in which such surviving spouse or eligible dependent children die, except as provided by this Article.

The last day of the month in which an employee’s employment with the State is terminated as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

The last day of the month in which a divorce becomes final.

The last day of the month, or as soon thereafter as administratively feasible, in which the Plan approves cancellation of coverage for an employee or retired employee.

The last day of the month in which a covered individual enters active military service.

The last day of the month in which a covered individual is found to have knowingly and willfully made or caused to be made a false statement or false representation of a material fact regarding eligibility or enrollment information or in a claim for reimbursement
of medical services under the Plan. The State Treasurer may make an exception to the provisions of this subdivision when persons subject to this subdivision have had a cessation of coverage for a period of five years and
have made a full and complete restitution to the Plan for all fraudulent claim amounts. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to obligate the State Treasurer to make an exception as allowed for under this subdivision.

The last day of the month in which an employee who is Medicare-eligible selects Medicare to be the primary payer of medical benefits. Coverage for a Medicare-eligible spouse of an employee shall also cease the last day of the month in which Medicare is
selected to be the primary payer of medical benefits for the Medicare-eligible spouse. Such members are eligible to apply for conversion coverage.

The last day of the month in which a covered individual is found to be ineligible for coverage.

The last day of the month for which a premium is paid in full.

Coverage under this Plan as a dependent child ceases when the child ceases to be a dependent child as defined by

G.S. 135-48.1

except, coverage may continue under this Plan for a period of not more than 36 months after loss of dependent status on a fully contributory basis provided the dependent child was covered under the Plan at the time
of loss of dependent status.

Coverage under the Plan as a surviving dependent child whether covered as a dependent of a surviving spouse, or as an individual member (no living parent), ceases when the child ceases to be a dependent child as defined by

G.S. 135-48.1

, except coverage may continue under the Plan on a fully contributory basis for a period of not more than 36 months after loss of dependent status.

Termination of employment shall mean termination for any reason, including layoff and leave of absence, except as provided in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, but shall not, for purposes of this Plan, include retirement upon which the employee
is granted an immediate service or disability pension under and pursuant to a State-supported Retirement System.

In the event of termination for any reason other than death, coverage under the Plan for an employee and his or her eligible spouse or dependent children, provided the eligible spouse or dependent children were covered under the Plan at termination of
employment may be continued for a period of not more than 18 months following termination of employment on a fully contributory basis. Employees who were covered under the Plan at termination of employment may be continued
for a period of not more than 18 months or 29 months if determined to be disabled under the Social Security Act, Title II, OASDI or Title XVI, SSI.

In the event of approved leave of absence without pay, other than for active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, coverage under this Plan for an employee and his or her dependents may be continued during the period of such leave of absence
by the employee’s paying one hundred percent (100%) of the cost.

If employment is terminated in the second half of a calendar month and the covered individual has made the required contribution for any coverage in the following month, that coverage will be continued to the end of the calendar month following the month
in which employment was terminated.

Employees paid for less than 12 months in a year, who are terminated at the end of the work year and who have made contributions for the non-work months, will continue to be covered to the end of the period for which they have made contributions, with
the understanding that if they are not employed by another State-covered employer under this Plan at the beginning of the next work year, the employee will refund to the ex-employer the amount of the employer’s cost paid
for them during the non-paycheck months.

Any employee receiving benefits pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter when the employee has less than five years of retirement membership service, or an employee on leave of absence without pay due to illness or injury for up to 12 months, is entitled
to continued coverage under the Plan for the employee and any eligible dependents by the employee’s paying one hundred percent (100%) of the cost.

A legally divorced spouse and any eligible dependent children of a covered employee or retired employee may continue coverage under this Plan for a period of not more than 36 months following the first of the month after a divorce becomes final on a fully
contributory basis, provided the former spouse and any eligible dependent children were covered under the Plan at the time a divorce became final.

A legally separated spouse of a covered employee or retired employee may continue coverage under this Plan for a period not to exceed 36 months from the separation date on a fully contributory basis, provided the separated spouse was covered under the
Plan at the time of separation and provided the covered employee’s or retired employee’s actions result in the loss of coverage for the separated spouse. Eligible dependent children may also continue coverage if covered under the
Plan at time of separation, provided the employee’s or retired employee’s actions result in the loss of coverage for the dependent children.

Whenever this section gives a right to continuation coverage, such coverage must be elected within the time allowed by applicable federal law.

Continuation coverage under this Plan shall not be continued past the occurrence of any one of the following events:

The termination of the Plan.

Failure of a Plan member to pay monthly in advance any required premiums.

A person becomes a covered employee or a dependent of a covered employee under any group health plan and that group health plan has no restrictions or limitations on benefits.

A person becomes eligible for Medicare benefits on or after the effective date of the continuation coverage.

The person was determined to be no longer disabled, provided the 18-month coverage was extended to 29 months due to having been determined to be disabled under the Social Security Act, Title II, OASDI or Title XVI, SSI.

The person reaches the maximum applicable continuation period of 18, 29, or 36 months.

Notice requirements concerning continuation coverage shall be developed by the Plan.

The spouse and any eligible dependent children of a covered employee may continue coverage under the Plan on a fully contributory basis for a period not to exceed 36 months from the date the employee becomes eligible for Medicare benefits which results
in a loss of coverage under the Plan, provided that the spouse and eligible dependent children were covered under the Plan at the time the employee became eligible for Medicare benefits which results in a loss of coverage under
the Plan.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, ss. 17, 19-21; 1985, c. 732, ss. 13, 34; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, ss. 19, 29(m)-(x); 1987, c. 738, s. 29(o); 1989, c. 752, s. 22(p); 1991, c. 427, s. 42; 1995,
c. 278, s. 2; 1997-512, ss. 32-35; 2000-184, s. 4; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (q); 2008-187, s. 49.5; 2009-16, s. 3(f); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(h), 2.10; 2011-183, s. 103; 2012-194, s. 31; 2015-100, s. 2; 2017-135, s. 1.

§ 135-48.45.
Conversion.

Upon a cessation of group coverage under the Plan and/or eligibility for group coverage under the Plan, an employee or dependent shall be entitled to a conversion to nongroup coverage without the necessity of a physical examination. Such conversion coverage
shall include hospitalization, surgical, and medical benefits as contained in the major medical and alternative plan conversion provisions of Article 53 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes. The State Treasurer in his or her sole
discretion shall approve the conversion coverage, which shall be administered by the Claims Processor through an insurance contract arranged by the Claims Processor, or administered as otherwise directed by the State Treasurer.
An eligible employee or dependent must apply for conversion coverage within 30 days after termination of group eligibility.

The State Treasurer shall provide for the continuation of conversion privilege exercised under the predecessor plan, on a fully contributory basis. The State Treasurer shall consult with the Board of Trustees before taking action under this subsection.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 21.6; 1985, c. 732, ss. 30, 56; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (r); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(i), 2.10.

§ 135-48.46.
Settlement agreements by employing units.

No employing unit may enter into any settlement agreement with an employee or former employee regarding health benefits covered under the Plan unless the employing unit has received written authorization from the Plan’s Executive Administrator.

No settlement agreement between an employing unit and an employee or former employee may reinstate health benefit coverage under the Plan more than one year prior to the date of the settlement agreement.

Any settlement agreement provision in violation of this section shall be void ab initio.

History.
2018-52, s. 8(a).

§ 135-48.47.
Participation in State Health Plan by local government employees and dependents.

Eligibility. — The employees and dependents of employees of local government units are eligible to participate in the State Health Plan, as provided in this section. This section does not apply to employees of a charter school operated by a municipality.Employees
and dependents participating under this section are not guaranteed participation in the Plan, and participation is contingent on their respective local government units (i) electing to participate in the Plan and (ii) complying
with the provisions of this section and this Article, as well as any policies adopted by the Plan.

Participation Requirements. — A local government unit may elect to participate in the State Health Plan. Participation shall be governed by the following:

In order to participate, a local government unit must do the following:

Pass a valid resolution expressing the local government’s desire to participate in the Plan.

Enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Plan that acknowledges the conditions of this section and this Article.

Provide at least 90 days’ notice to the Plan prior to entry and complete the requirements of this subdivision at least 60 days prior to entry.

In order to participate, a local government unit and its employees must meet the federal requirements to participate in a governmental plan. The Plan may refuse participation to persons who would jeopardize the Plan’s qualification as a governmental plan
under federal law.

(2a)
The Plan shall admit any local government unit that meets the administrative and legal requirements of this section, regardless of the claims experience of the local government unit group or the financial
impact on the Plan.

A local government unit shall determine the eligibility of its employees and employees’ dependents.

(3a)
The premiums employees pay to the local government unit for their own coverage shall conform to the premiums in the structure set by the Plan. The premiums employees pay to the local government unit for
coverage of their dependents may be determined by the local government unit but may not exceed the premiums set by the Plan.

Premiums for coverage and Plan options shall be the same as those offered to State employees and dependents on a fully contributory basis.

The local government unit shall pay all premiums for all covered individuals directly to the Plan or the Plan’s designee.

Enrollment Limitation. — Local governments may elect to participate until the number of employees and dependents of employees of local governments enrolled in the Plan reaches 16,000, after which time no additional local governments may join the Plan.
Any local government electing to participate must have less than 1,000 employees and dependents enrolled in health coverage at the time the local government provides notice to the Plan of its desire to participate.

Local governments participating in the Plan as of April 1, 2016, may elect to withdraw from participating in the Plan effective January 1, 2017. Notice of withdrawal must be given by the local government to the Plan no later than September 15, 2016.

Except as permitted under subsection (d) of this section, a local government unit’s election to participate in the Plan is irrevocable.

History.
2014-75, s. 3; 2014-105, s. 1; 2015-112, s. 2; 2016-104, ss. 4, 5(a), 6; 2018-145, s. 20(d); 2020-48, s. 1.17.

Local Government Units Previously Participating in State Health Plan.

Session Laws 2015-112, s. 3, provides: “Notwithstanding any prior session law, any action taken by a Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees or of the predecessor plan to the current State Health Plan, or any other
law, any local government unit that participates in the State Health Plan as of the effective date of this act [June 24, 2015] may elect to be subject to the new requirements in

G.S. 135-48.47

, as enacted by this act. Local government units electing to participate in the Plan under

G.S. 135-48.47

shall cease monthly contributions to the Retiree Health Benefit Fund in the month in which coverage begins under G.S. 135-48.47. Local government units shall not be entitled to a refund of any prior contributions to the
Retiree Health Benefit Fund. Nothing in this section, nor an election to participate in the State Health Plan under G.S. 135-48.47, shall impact any existing debt to the Retiree Health Benefit Fund owed by any local government unit.”

Session Laws 2018-3, authorized municipalities in the Towns of Cornelius, Huntersville, Matthews, and Mint Hill to establish and operate charter schools.

§ 135-48.48.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.49.
IRC Sections 6055 and 6056 regulatory reporting.

The Plan shall be responsible for reporting coverage for retirees and coverage for direct bill members, except for individuals participating in Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (COBRA) coverage, as required by Section 6055 of the Internal
Revenue Code. The Plan shall provide employing units with access to Plan data necessary for employing units to meet filing requirements under Sections 6055 and 6056 of the Internal Revenue Code. The Plan may facilitate the availability
of a reporting solution; however, the employing unit is responsible for paying all costs associated with the use of any reporting solution made available by the Plan.

History.
2016-104, s. 7.

§ 135-48.50.
Coverage mandates.

The Plan shall provide coverage subject to the following coverage mandates:

Abortion coverage. — The Plan shall not provide coverage for abortions for which State funds could not be used under

G.S. 143C-6-5

.5. The Plan shall, however, provide coverage for subsequent complications or related charges arising from an abortion not covered under this subdivision.

Immunizations. — The Plan shall pay one hundred percent (100%) of allowable medical charges for immunizations for the prevention of contagious diseases as generally accepted medical practices would dictate when directed by a credentialed provider as
determined by the claims processor.

Insulin. — Prescription benefits shall be provided for insulin even though a prescription is not required.

Mental health parity. — Benefits for the treatment of mental illness and chemical dependency are covered by the Plan and shall be subject to the same deductibles, durational limits, and coinsurance factors as are benefits for physical illness generally.
Nothing in this subdivision, however, shall prohibit the Plan from requiring the most cost-effective treatment setting to be utilized by a person undergoing necessary care and treatment for chemical dependency.

[Reserved.]

Permissive coverage extension. — If a covered service becomes excluded from coverage under the Plan, the Executive Administrator and Claims Processor may, in the event of exceptional situations creating undue hardships or adverse medical conditions,
allow persons enrolled in the Plan to remain covered by the Plan’s previous coverage for up to three months after the effective date of the change in coverage, provided the persons so enrolled had been undergoing a continuous plan
of specific treatment initiated within three months prior to the effective date of the change in coverage.

Reconstructive surgery. — Charges for cosmetic surgery or treatment required for correction of damage caused by accidental injury sustained by the covered individual while coverage under this plan is in force on his or her account or to correct congenital
deformities or anomalies shall not be excluded if they otherwise qualify as covered medical expenses. Reconstructive breast surgery following mastectomy, as those terms are defined in

G.S. 58-51-62

, shall be covered.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10; 2011-145, s. 29.23(c); 2012-194, s. 32.

§ 135-48.51.
(Effective until January 1, 2022) Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:

G.S. 58-3-191

, Managed care reporting and disclosure requirements.

G.S. 58-3-221

, Access to nonformulary and restricted access prescription drugs.

G.S. 58-3-223

, Managed care access to specialist care.

G.S. 58-3-225

, Prompt claim payments under health benefit plans.

G.S. 58-3-235

, Selection of specialist as primary care provider.

G.S. 58-3-240

, Direct access to pediatrician for minors.

G.S. 58-3-245

, Provider directories.

G.S. 58-3-250

, Payment obligations for covered services.

G.S. 58-3-265

, Prohibition on managed care provider incentives.

G.S. 58-3-280

, Coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of lymphedema.

G.S. 58-3-285

, Coverage for hearing aids.

G.S. 58-50-30

, Right to choose services of certain providers.

G.S. 58-67-88

, Continuity of care.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10; 2012-129, s. 2; 2013-296, s. 3; 2013-324, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-129, s. 2, effective October 1, 2012, inserted “physical therapist” in subdivision (12).

Session Laws 2013-296, s. 3, effective October 1, 2013, rewrote subdivision (12), which formerly read “G.S. 58-50-30, Right to choose services of optometrist, podiatrist, licensed clinical social worker, certified substance abuse professional, licensed
professional counselor, dentist, physical therapist, chiropractor, psychologist, pharmacist, certified fee-based practicing pastoral counselor, advanced practice nurse, licensed marriage and family therapist, or physician assistant.”

Session Laws 2013-324, s. 5, effective July 23, 2013, rewrote subdivision (9), which formerly read “G.S. 58-3-265, Payment obligations for covered services.”

§ 135-48.51.
Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:

G.S. 58-3-191

, Managed care reporting and disclosure requirements.

G.S. 58-3-221

, Access to nonformulary and restricted access prescription drugs.

G.S. 58-3-223

, Managed care access to specialist care.

G.S. 58-3-225

, Prompt claim payments under health benefit plans.

G.S. 58-3-235

, Selection of specialist as primary care provider.

G.S. 58-3-240

, Direct access to pediatrician for minors.

G.S. 58-3-245

, Provider directories. (7a)

G.S. 58-3-247

, Insurance identification card.

G.S. 58-3-250

, Payment obligations for covered services.

G.S. 58-3-265

, Prohibition on managed care provider incentives.

G.S. 58-3-280

, Coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of lymphedema.

G.S. 58-3-285

, Coverage for hearing aids.

G.S. 58-50-30

, Right to choose services of certain providers.

G.S. 58-67-88

, Continuity of care.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10; 2012-129, s. 2; 2013-296, s. 3; 2013-324, s. 5; 2021-30, s. 1(b).

§ 135-48.52.
General limitations and exclusions.

The Plan shall not provide coverage for or pay any benefits for any of the following:

Charges to the extent paid, or which the individual is entitled to have paid, or to obtain without cost, in accordance with any government laws or regulations except Medicare. If a charge is made to any such person which he or she is legally required
to pay, any benefits under this Plan will be computed in accordance with its provisions, taking into account only such charge. “Any government” includes the federal, State, provincial, or local government, or any political subdivision
thereof, of the United States, Canada, or any other country.

Charges for services rendered in connection with any occupational injury or disease arising out of and in the course of employment with any employer, if (i) the employer furnishes, pays for or provides reimbursement for such charges, or (ii) the employer
makes a settlement payment for such charges, or (iii) the person incurring such charges waives or fails to assert his or her rights respecting such charges.

Charges for any services rendered as a result of injury or sickness due to an act of war, declared or undeclared, which act shall have occurred after the effective date of a person’s coverage under the Plan.

Charges for any services with respect to which there is no legal obligation to pay. For the purposes of this item, any charge which exceeds the charge that would have been made if a person were not covered under this Plan shall, to the extent of such
excess, be treated as a charge for which there is no legal obligation to pay; and any charge made by any person for anything which is normally or customarily furnished by such person without payment from the recipient or user thereof
shall also be treated as a charge for which there is no legal obligation to pay.

Charges during a continuous hospital confinement which commenced prior to the effective date of the person’s coverage under this Plan.

Charges for services unless a claim is filed within 18 months from the date of service.

Charges for sexual dysfunction or hair growth drugs or for nonmedically necessary drugs used for cosmetic purposes.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10.

§ 135-48.53.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.54.
Optional participation for charter schools operated by private nonprofit corporations or municipalities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-84, s. 11(a), effective June 25, 2018.

No later than two years after both parties have signed the written charter under

G.S. 115C-218.15

, the board of directors of a charter school operated by a private nonprofit corporation or a charter school operated by a municipality shall elect whether to become a participating employer in the Plan in accordance
with this Article. This election shall be in writing and filed with the Plan and the State Board of Education. This election is effective for each charter school employee as of the date of that employee’s entry into eligible service.

(b1) A charter school making an election to become a participating employing unit in the Plan under this section shall provide notice of the intent to make that election six months prior to making the election; provided that the Plan shall not prohibit
a charter school from becoming a participating employing unit solely because that charter school did not provide this notice.

A board’s election to become a participating employer in the Plan under this section is irrevocable and shall require all eligible employees of the charter school to participate.

If a charter school’s board of directors does not elect to become a participating employer in the Plan under this section, that school’s employees and the dependents of those employees are not eligible for any benefits under the Plan on account of employment
with a charter school.

The board of directors of each charter school shall notify each of its employees as to whether the board elected to become a participating employer in the Plan under this section. This notification shall be in writing and shall be provided within 30 days
of the board’s election or at the time an initial offer for employment is made, whichever occurs last. If the board did not elect to become a participating employer in the Plan, the notice shall include a statement that the employee
shall have no legal recourse against the board or the State for any possible benefit under the Plan. The employee shall provide written acknowledgment of the employee’s receipt of the notification under this subsection.

History.
1998-212, s. 9.14A(e); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (i); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(f), 2.10; 2014-101, s. 7; 2018-84, s. 11(a); 2018-145, s. 20(e).

Local Modification.

Clover Garden Charter School: 2003-354, s. 1; Corvian Community School: 2013-279, s. 1.

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 2.6(f), effective January 1, 2012, recodified former G.S. 135-45.5 as

G.S. 135-48.54

. Former G.S. 135-45.5 itself was formerly codified as G.S. 135-40.3A. It was recodified as G.S. 135-39.17 under Part 3A of Article 3A of Chapter 135 by Session Laws 2008-168, s. 3(i), effective July 1, 2008, but was
renumbered as G.S. 135-45.5 at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

§ 135-48.55.
Interest charged to charter schools and local government units on late premiums.

The total amount of premiums due the Plan from charter schools and local government units as employing units, including amounts withheld from the compensation of Plan members, that is not remitted to the Plan by the fifteenth day of the month following
the due date of remittance shall be assessed interest of one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of the amount due the Plan, per month or fraction thereof, beginning with the sixteenth day of the month following the due date of the remittance.
The interest authorized by this section shall be assessed until the premium payment plus the accrued interest amount is remitted to the Plan. The remittance of premium payments under this section shall be presumed to have been made
if the remittance is postmarked in the United States mail on a date not later than the fifteenth day of the month following the due date of the remittance.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 52; 1991, c. 427, s. 5; 1997-468, s. 4; 1998-1, s. 4(e); 1999-237, s. 28.29(h); 2003-69, s. 2; 2004-124, s. 31.21(c); 2005-276, s. 29.31(e); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(m),
(m1), (o); 2007-345, ss. 11, 12; 2008-107, s. 10.13(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (m); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-571, s. 3(c); 2011-85, s. 2.5(f); 2014-75, s. 4.